Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2887
Delegated dispensing permit; worker; proficiency demonstration; supervision; liability.

(1) A public health clinic worker or dialysis drug or device distributor worker shall demonstrate proficiency to the delegating pharmacist, according to the standards approved by the board. The delegating pharmacist shall document proficiency for each worker. In addition, a public health clinic worker shall be supervised by a licensed health care professional specified in subdivision (1) of section 38-2884 for the first month that such worker is dispensing refills of contraceptives.

(2) Following initial training and proficiency demonstration, the public health clinic worker or dialysis drug or device distributor worker shall demonstrate continued proficiency at least annually. A dialysis drug or device distributor worker shall attend annual training programs taught by a pharmacist. Documentation of such training shall be maintained in the worker's employee file.

(3) The public health clinic or dialysis drug or device distributor for which a public health clinic worker or dialysis drug or device distributor worker is working shall be liable for acts or omissions on the part of such worker.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 19;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 79;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 61;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.56;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 983;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 50.